Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.010

Assessment district—All property to be assessed—Basis.

All property included within the limits of a local improvement district or utility local improvement district shall be considered to be the property specially benefited by the local improvement and shall be the property to be assessed to pay the cost and expense thereof or such part thereof as may be chargeable against the property specially benefited. The cost and expense shall be assessed upon all the property in accordance with the special benefits conferred thereon.

[ 1985 c 397 s 3; 1967 c 52 s 9; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.010. Prior: 1957 c 144 s 16; prior: 1947 c 155 s 1, part; 1941 c 90 s 1, part; 1915 c 168 s 2, part; 1911 c 98 s 13, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9365, part.]

NOTES:

Authority supplemental—1985 c 397: See RCW 35.51.900.

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.